bezhta.case.lexd
LEXICON Infl
<erg>:[erg]
<genI>:с[gen]
<genII>:ла[gen2]
<dat>:л[dat]
<ins>:д[ins]

LEXICON Essive
<super><essive>:кьа
<sub><essive>:лӏ[sub]
<ad><essive>:гъа[ad]
<apud><essive>:дой
<cum><essive>:гъой
<in><essive>:ъ[in]
<cont><essive>:лъ[cont]
<poss><essive>:хъа[poss]

LEXICON Lative
<lative>:{л}

LEXICON Translative
<translative>:кьа̄
<translative>:лкьа̄[ad,poss]

LEXICON Ablative
<ablative>:{с} #как описывать в twol, если где-то по гармонии гласных меняется на ос, где-то -- на ис?
<ablative>:со[sub,cont]

LEXICON Distant
<dist>:да̄

LEXICON OblSuffix
<obl>:и[digit]
<obl>:ла[num]
<obl>:ли[ord]
